California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(f) Any person who fails to pay any tax to the state or any amount of tax, installment, or prepayment required to be collected and paid to the state, except amounts of determinations made by the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration under Article 2 (commencing with Section 43201), within the time required shall pay a penalty of 10 percent of the tax or amount of tax, in addition to the tax or amount of tax, plus interest at the modified adjusted rate per month, or fraction thereof, established pursuant to Section 6591.5, from
 the date on which the tax or amount of tax required to be collected became due and payable to the state until the date of payment.

(g) In determining whether a person’s estimated tax liability averages twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) or more per month, the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration may consider tax returns filed pursuant to this part and any other information in the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration’s possession.

(h) (1) The penalties imposed by subdivisions (d), (e), and (f) shall be limited to a maximum of 10 percent of the taxes due for any one return, installment, or prepayment. Any person remitting taxes by electronic funds transfer shall be subject to the penalties under this section and not Section 43155.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), any
 person remitting fees imposed pursuant to Section 25205.5 or former Section 25205.5.2 of the Health and Safety Code by electronic funds transfer is subject to the penalties imposed by this section and the penalties imposed by Section 43155.01.

(i) The California Department of Tax and Fee Administration shall promulgate regulations pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code for purposes of implementing this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 62, Sec. 11.   (SB 166)   Effective July 6, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

43171.

If the board finds that a person’s failure to make payment by an appropriate electronic funds transfer in accordance with board procedures is due to reasonable cause and circumstances beyond the person’s control, and occurred notwithstanding the exercise of ordinary care and in the absence of willful neglect, that person shall be relieved of the penalty provided in subdivision (e) of Section 43170. Any person seeking to be relieved of the penalty shall file with the board a statement under penalty of perjury setting forth the facts upon which he or she bases
 his or her claim for relief.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 923, Sec. 45.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

43172.

(a) “Electronic funds transfer” means any transfer of funds, other than a transaction originated by check, draft, or similar paper instrument, that is initiated through an electronic terminal, telephonic instrument, or computer or magnetic tape, so as to order, instruct, or authorize a financial institution to debit or credit an account. Electronic funds transfers shall be accomplished by an automated clearinghouse debit, an automated clearinghouse credit, or by Federal Reserve Wire Transfer (Fedwire).

(b) “Automated clearinghouse” means any federal reserve bank, or an organization established in agreement with the National Automated Clearing House Association, that operates as a clearinghouse for transmitting or receiving entries between banks or bank accounts and which authorizes an electronic transfer of funds between these banks or bank accounts.

(c) “Automated clearinghouse debit” means a transaction in which the state, through its designated depository bank, originates an automated clearinghouse transaction debiting the person’s bank account and crediting the state’s bank account for the amount of tax. Banking costs incurred for the automated clearinghouse debit transaction shall be paid by the state.

(d) “Automated clearinghouse credit” means an automated clearinghouse transaction in which the person through
 his or her own bank, originates an entry crediting the state’s bank account and debiting his or her own bank account. Banking costs incurred for the automated clearinghouse credit transaction charged to the state shall be paid by the person originating the credit.

(e) “Fedwire transfer” means any transaction originated by a person and utilizing the national electronic payment system to transfer funds through the federal reserve banks, when that person debits his or her own bank account and credits the state’s bank account. Electronic funds transfers pursuant to Section 43170 may be made by Fedwire only if payment cannot, for good cause, be made according to subdivision (a), and the use of Fedwire is preapproved by the board. Banking costs incurred for the Fedwire transaction charged to the person and to the state shall be paid by the person originating the transaction.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 923, Sec. 45.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

43173.

(a) Any return, declaration, statement, or other document required to be made under this part that is filed using electronic media shall be filed and authenticated pursuant to any method or form the board may prescribe.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, any return declaration, statement, or other document otherwise required to be signed that is filed by the taxpayer using electronic media in a form as required by the board shall be deemed to be a signed, valid original
 document, including upon reproduction to paper form by the board.

(c) Electronic media includes, but is not limited to, computer modem, magnetic media, optical disk, facsimile machine, or telephone.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 459, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Deficiency Determinations [43201. - 43204.]

43201.

(a) If the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration is dissatisfied with the return or report filed or the amount of tax paid to the state by any taxpayer, or if no return or report has been filed or no payment or payments of the taxes have been made to the state by a taxpayer, the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration may compute and determine the amount to be paid, based upon any information available to it. In addition, where the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration is authorized to collect a tax for another state agency, the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration may issue a notice of determination or similar billing document for collection of the tax. One or more additional determinations may be made of the amount of tax due for one, or for more than one, period. The
 amount of tax so determined shall bear interest at the modified adjusted rate per month, or fraction thereof, established pursuant to Section 6591.5, from the date the amount of the tax, or any portion thereof, became due and payable until the date of payment. In making a determination, the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration may offset overpayments for a period or periods against underpayments for another period or periods and against the interest and penalties on the underpayments.

(b) If any part of the deficiency for which a determination of an additional amount due is found to have been occasioned by negligence or intentional disregard of this part or authorized regulations, a penalty of 10 percent of the amount of the determination shall be added, plus interest as provided above.

(c) If any part of the deficiency for which a determination of an additional
 amount due is found to be occasioned by fraud or an intent to evade this part or authorized regulations, a penalty of 25 percent of the amount of the determination shall be added, plus interest as provided in subdivision (a).

(d) The California Department of Tax and Fee Administration shall give to the taxpayer written notice of its determination. The notice shall be served in one of the following manners:

(1) By placing the notice in a sealed envelope, with postage paid, addressed to the taxpayer at their address as it appears in the records of the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration. Service made pursuant to this paragraph shall be deemed complete at the time of the deposit of the notice in a United States Post Office, or a mailbox, sub-post office, substation, or mail chute, or other facility regularly maintained or provided by the United States Postal Service
 without extension of time for any reason.

(2) By personally delivering the notice to the person to be served. Service made pursuant to this paragraph shall be deemed complete at the time of delivery. Personal service to a corporation may be made by delivery of a notice to any person designated in the Code of Civil Procedure to be served for the corporation with summons and complaint in a civil action.

(3) (A) By delivering the notice electronically via secure transmission when either of the following applies:

(i) The taxpayer requests the notice of determination to be sent electronically via secure transmission.

(ii) The California Department of Tax and Fee Administration has evidence that the taxpayer no longer receives mail at
 the address of record and has previously provided an address for electronic mail.

(B) Service provided pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall be deemed complete at the time the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration electronically transmits the notice via the taxpayer’s secure web portal, without extension of time for any reason.

(e) This section does not apply to a return or payment that becomes due on or after November 30, 2024, for any fee imposed pursuant to Section 25205.5 or former Section 25205.5.2 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 62, Sec. 12.   (SB 166)   Effective July 6, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

43201.01.

(a) If the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration is dissatisfied with the return or report filed or the amount of fee paid to the state by any feepayer, or if no return or report has been filed or no payment or payments of the fees have been made to the state by a feepayer, the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration may compute and determine the amount to be paid, based upon any information available to it. In addition, where the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration is authorized to collect a fee for another state agency, the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration may issue a notice of determination or similar billing document for collection of the fee. One or more additional determinations may be made of the amount of fee due for one, or for more than one, period. The
 amount of fee so determined shall bear interest at the modified adjusted rate per month, or fraction thereof, established pursuant to Section 6591.5, from the date the amount of the fee, or any portion thereof, became due and payable until the date of payment. In making a determination, the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration may offset overpayments for a period or periods against underpayments for another period or periods and against the interest and penalties on the underpayments.

(b) If any part of the deficiency for which a determination of an additional amount due is found to have been occasioned by negligence or intentional disregard of this part or authorized regulations, a penalty of 10 percent of the amount of the determination shall be added, plus interest as provided in subdivision (a).

(c) If a feepayer willfully or knowingly provides incorrect
 information or withholds information that results in a deficient payment or nonpayment, as determined by California Department of Tax and Fee Administration based upon a preponderance of the evidence, a penalty of 300 percent of the amount of the determination shall be added.

(d) Notwithstanding any other limitation to the maximum penalty amount imposed for any one payment or return specified in this part, the penalties imposed pursuant to this section shall be in addition to any other penalties imposed under this part.

(e) The California Department of Tax and Fee Administration shall give to the feepayer written notice of its determination. The notice shall be served in one
 of the following manners:

(1) By placing the notice in a sealed envelope, with postage paid, addressed to the feepayer at their address as it appears in the records of the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration. Service made pursuant to this paragraph shall be deemed complete at the time of the deposit of the notice in a United States post office, or a mailbox, subpost office, substation or mail chute, or other facility regularly maintained or provided by the United States Postal Service without extension of time for any reason.

(2) By personally delivering the notice to the person to be served. Service made pursuant to this paragraph shall be deemed complete at the time of delivery. Personal service to a corporation may be made by delivery of a notice to any person designated in the Code of Civil Procedure to be served for the corporation with summons and complaint
 in a civil action.

(3) (A) By delivering the notice electronically via secure transmission when either of the following applies:

(i) The feepayer requests the notice of determination to be sent electronically via secure transmission.

(ii) The California Department of Tax and Fee Administration has evidence that the feepayer no longer receives mail at the address of record and has previously provided an address for electronic mail.

(B) Service provided pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall be deemed complete at the time the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration electronically transmits the notice via the feepayer’s secure web portal, without extension of time for any reason.

(f) This section shall only apply to a return or payment that becomes due on or after November 30, 2024, for any fee imposed pursuant to Section 25205.5 or former Section 25205.5.2 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 62, Sec. 13.   (SB 166)   Effective July 6, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

43202.

(a) Except in the case of fraud or intent to evade this part or authorized rules and regulations as set forth in subdivision (c) of Section 43201, willful or knowing provision of incorrect information or withholding of information as set forth in subdivision
 (c) of Section 43201.01, or failure to make a return, every notice of a determination of an additional amount due shall be served within three years after the date when the amount should have been paid or the return was due, or within three years after the return was filed, whichever period expires later. In the case of failure to make a return, the notice of determination shall be served within eight years after the date the report or return was due.

(b) The limitation specified in subdivision (a) shall not apply to a liability for the fees described in subdivision (c) of Section 25205.25 of the Health and Safety Code that is proposed to be determined with respect to a taxpayer if a notice of determination for
 the fee imposed pursuant to Section 25205.2 of the Health and Safety Code has been given pursuant to Section 43201 or 43350 for the same period and site, or with respect to a taxpayer that has paid the fee imposed by Section 25205.2 of the Health and Safety Code for the same period and site. The notice of determination with respect to the fees described in subdivision (c) of Section 25205.25 of the Health and Safety Code shall be given within 90 days from the date of final action of the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration or final judicial action, whichever is later, concerning liability for the fee imposed pursuant to Section 25205.2 of the Health and Safety Code.

(c) The limitation specified in subdivision (a) shall
 not apply to a liability for the fee imposed pursuant to Section 25205.2 of the Health and Safety Code that is proposed to be determined with respect to a taxpayer if a notice of determination for the fees described in subdivision (c) of Section 25205.25 of the Health and Safety Code has been given pursuant to Section 43201 or 43350 for the same period and site, or with respect to a taxpayer that has paid the fees described in subdivision (c) of Section 25205.25 of the Health and Safety Code for the same period and site. The notice of determination with respect to the fee imposed pursuant
 to Section 25205.2 of the Health and Safety Code shall be given within 90 days from the date of final action of the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration or final judicial action, whichever is later, concerning liability for the fees described in subdivision (c) of Section 25205.25 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 62, Sec. 14.   (SB 166)   Effective July 6, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

43203.

In the case of a deficiency arising under this part during the lifetime of a decedent, a notice of deficiency determination shall be served within four months after written request therefor, in the form required by the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration, by the fiduciary of the estate or trust or by any other person liable for the tax or any portion thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 499, Sec. 82.   (SB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

43204.

If before the expiration of the time prescribed in Section 43202 for serving a notice of deficiency determination the taxpayer has consented in writing to service of the notice after such time, the notice may be served at any time prior to the expiration of the period agreed upon. The period so agreed upon may be extended by subsequent agreements in writing made before the expiration of the period previously agreed upon.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 499, Sec. 83.   (SB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Redeterminations [43301. - 43307.]

43301.

Any person from whom an amount is determined to be due under Article 2 (commencing with Section 43201), or any person directly interested, may petition for a redetermination thereof within 30 days after service upon him or her of notice of the determination. If a petition for redetermination is not filed within the 30-day period, the amount determined to be due becomes final at the expiration thereof.

No petition for redetermination of taxes determined under this part shall be accepted or considered by the board if the petition is founded upon the grounds that the director has improperly or erroneously
 determined that any substance is a hazardous or extremely hazardous waste. Any appeal of a determination that a substance is a hazardous or extremely hazardous waste shall be made to the director.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1707, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

43302.

Every petition for redetermination shall be in writing and shall state the specific grounds upon which the petition is founded. The petition may be amended to state additional grounds at any time prior to the date on which the board issues its order or decision upon the petition for redetermination.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 756, Sec. 3.   Effective September 25, 1981.)
-------------------------------------------

43303.

If a petition for redetermination is filed within the 30-day period, the board shall reconsider the amount determined to be due, and, if the person has so requested in his or her petition, the board shall grant him or her an oral hearing and shall give him or her 10 days’ notice of the time and place of the hearing. The board may continue the hearing from time to time as may be necessary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1707, Sec. 13.)
-------------------------------------------

43304.

The California Department of Tax and Fee Administration may decrease or increase the amount of the determination before it becomes final, but the amount may be increased only if a claim for the increase is asserted by the
 California Department of Tax and Fee Administration at or before the hearing. Unless the
 penalty imposed by subdivision (c) of Section 43201 or subdivision (c) of Section 43201.01 applies to the amount of the determination as originally made or as increased, the claim for increase must be asserted within eight years after the date the return for the period for which the increase is asserted was due.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 72, Sec. 60.   (SB 156)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

43305.

The order or decision of the board upon a petition for redetermination shall become final 30 days after service upon the petitioner of notice thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 756, Sec. 3.   Effective September 25, 1981.)
-------------------------------------------

43306.

All amounts determined to be due by the board under Article 2 (commencing with Section 43201) are due and payable at the time they become final, and, if not paid when due and payable, a penalty of 10 percent of the amount determined to be due shall be added to the amount due and payable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 496, Sec. 34.   Effective July 12, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

43307.

Any notice required by this article shall be served in the same manner as prescribed for service of notice by Section 43201 or 43201.01.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 499, Sec. 84.   (SB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Jeopardy Determinations [43350. - 43352.]

43350.

If the
 California Department of Tax and Fee Administration believes that the collection of any amount of tax will be jeopardized by delay, it shall thereupon make a determination of the amount of tax due, noting that fact upon the determination, and the amount of tax shall be immediately due and payable. If the amount of the tax, interest, and penalty specified in the jeopardy determination is not paid, or a petition for redetermination is not filed, within 10 days after the service upon the taxpayer of notice of the determination, the determination becomes final, and the delinquency penalty and interest provided in Section 43155 or 43155.01 shall attach to the amount of tax specified therein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 72, Sec. 61.   (SB 156)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

43351.

The taxpayer against whom a jeopardy determination is made may file a petition for the redetermination thereof, pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 43301), with the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration within 10 days after the service upon the taxpayer of notice of the determination, but they shall, within the 10-day period, deposit with the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration such security as it deems necessary to insure compliance with the provisions of this part. The security may be sold by the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration at public sale if it becomes necessary in order to recover any amount due under this part. Notice of the sale may be served upon the person who deposited the security in the same manner as prescribed for service of notice by
 Section 43201 or 43201.01. Upon any such sale, the surplus, if any, above the amount due under this part shall be returned to the person who deposited the security.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 499, Sec. 85.   (SB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

43352.

In accordance with such rules and regulations as the board may prescribe, the person against whom a jeopardy determination is made may apply for an administrative hearing for one or more of the following purposes:

(a) To establish that the determination is excessive.

(b) To establish that the sale of property that may be seized after issuance of the jeopardy determination, or any part thereof, shall be delayed pending the administrative hearing because the sale would result in irreparable injury to
 the person.

(c) To request the release of all or a part of the property to the person.

(d) To request a stay of collection activities.

The application shall be filed within 30 days after service of the notice of jeopardy determination and shall be in writing and state the specific factual and legal grounds upon which it is founded. The person shall not be required to post any security in order to file the application and to obtain the hearing. However, if the person does not deposit, within the 10-day period prescribed in Section 43351, such security as the board may deem necessary to ensure compliance with this part, the filing of the application shall not operate as a stay of collection activities, except sale of property seized after issuance of the jeopardy determination. Upon a showing of good cause for failure to file a timely
 application for administrative hearing, the board may allow a filing of the application and grant the person an administrative hearing. The filing of an application pursuant to this section shall not affect the provisions of Section 43350 relating to the finality date of the determination or to penalty or interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 756, Sec. 3.   Effective September 25, 1981.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Collection of Tax [43401. - 43450.]



  ARTICLE 1. Suit for Tax [43401. - 43402.]

43401.

The board may bring such legal actions as are necessary to collect any deficiency in the tax required to be paid, and, upon the board’s request, the Attorney General shall bring the actions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 756, Sec. 3.   Effective September 25, 1981.)
-------------------------------------------

43402.

In any suit brought to enforce the rights of the state with respect to taxes, a certificate by the board showing the delinquency shall be prima facie evidence of the levy of the tax, of the delinquency of the amount of tax, interest, and penalty set forth therein, and of compliance by the board with all provisions of this part in relation to the computation and levy of the tax. In the action, a writ of attachment may be issued in the manner provided by Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 485.010) of Title 6.5 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 496, Sec. 35.   Effective July 12, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Judgment for Tax [43413. - 43414.]

43413.

(a) If any person fails to pay any amount imposed pursuant to this part at the time that it becomes due and payable, the amount thereof, including penalties and interest, together with any costs in addition thereto, shall thereupon be a perfected and enforceable state tax lien. Such a lien is subject to Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 7150) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(b) For the purpose of this section, amounts are “due and payable” on the following dates:

(1) For amounts disclosed on a return received by the board before the date the return is delinquent, the date the return would have been delinquent.

(2) For amounts disclosed on a return filed on or after the date the return is delinquent, the date the return is received by the board.

(3) For amounts determined under Section 43350 (pertaining to jeopardy assessments), the date the notice of the board’s finding is mailed or issued.

(4) For all other amounts, the date the assessment is final.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 756, Sec. 3.   Effective September 25, 1981.)
-------------------------------------------

43414.

(a) If the board determines that the amount of tax, interest, and penalties are sufficiently secured by a lien on other property or that the release or subordination of the lien imposed under this article will not jeopardize the collection of the amount of the tax, interest, and penalties, the board may at any time release all or any portion of the property subject to the lien from the lien or may subordinate the lien to other liens and encumbrances.

(b) If the board finds that the liability represented by the lien imposed under this
 article, including any interest accrued thereon, is legally unenforceable, the board may release the lien.

(c) A certificate by the board to the effect that any property has been released from a lien or that the lien has been subordinated to other liens and encumbrances is conclusive evidence that such property has been released or that the lien has been subordinated as provided in the certificate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 756, Sec. 3.   Effective September 25, 1981.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Warrant for Collection [43421. - 43423.]

43421.

At any time within three years after any person is delinquent in the payment of any amount herein required to be paid, or within 10 years after the last recording of an abstract under Section 43412 or the last recording or filing of a notice of state tax lien under Section 7171 of the Government Code, the board, or its authorized representative, may issue a warrant for the enforcement of any liens and for the collection of any amount required to be paid to the state under this part. The warrant shall be directed to any sheriff or marshal and shall have the
 same effect as a writ of execution. The warrant shall be levied and sale made pursuant to it in the same manner and with the same effect as a levy of, and sale pursuant to, a writ of execution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 872, Sec. 163.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

43422.

The board may pay or advance to the sheriff or marshal, the same fees, commissions, and expenses for their services as are provided by law for similar services pursuant to a writ of execution. The board, and not the court, shall approve the fees for publication in a newspaper.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 872, Sec. 164.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

43423.

The fees, commissions, and expenses are the obligation of the person required to pay any amount under this part and may be collected from him or her by virtue of the warrant or in any other manner provided in this part for the collection of the tax.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 756, Sec. 3.   Effective September 25, 1981.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Seizure and Sale [43431. - 43434.]

43431.

Whenever any taxpayer is delinquent in the payment of the tax, the board, or its authorized representative, may seize any property, real or personal, of the taxpayer, and sell at public auction the property seized, or a sufficient portion thereof, to pay the tax due, together with any penalties imposed for the delinquency and all costs that have been incurred on account of the seizure and sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 756, Sec. 3.   Effective September 25, 1981.)
-------------------------------------------

43432.

Notice of the sale, and the time and place thereof, shall be given to the delinquent taxpayer and to all persons who have an interest of record in the property at least 20 days before the date set for the sale in the following manner: The notice shall be personally served or enclosed in an envelope addressed to the taxpayer or other person at his or her last known residence or place of business in this state as it appears upon the records of the board, if any, and depositing it in the United States registered mail, postage prepaid. The notice shall be published pursuant to Section 6063 of the Government Code in a newspaper of general circulation
 published in the city in which the property or a part thereof is situated if any part thereof is situated in a city or, if not, in a newspaper of general circulation published in the county in which the property or a part thereof is located. Notice shall also be posted in both of the following manners:

(a) One public place in the city in which the interest in property is to be sold if it is to be sold in a city, or, if not to be sold in a city, one public place in the county in which the interest to the property is to be sold.

(b) One conspicuous place on the property.

The notice shall contain a description of the property to be sold, a statement of the amount due, including taxes, interest, penalties, and costs, the name of the taxpayer, and the further statement that unless the amount due is paid on or before the time fixed in the
 notice for the sale, the property, or so much thereof as may be necessary, will be sold in accordance with law and the notice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1528, Sec. 14.)
-------------------------------------------

43433.

At the sale the property shall be sold by the board, or by its authorized agent, in accordance with law and the notice, and the board shall deliver to the purchaser a bill of sale for the personal property and a deed for any real property sold. The bill of sale or deed vests title in the purchaser. The unsold portion of any property seized may be left at the place of sale at the risk of the taxpayer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 652, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

43434.

If upon the sale the moneys received exceed the amount of all taxes, penalties, and costs due the state from the taxpayer, the board shall return the excess to him or her and obtain his or her receipt. If any person having an interest in or lien upon the property files with the board prior to the sale notice of his or her interest, the board shall withhold any excess pending a determination of the rights of the respective parties to the excess moneys by a court of competent jurisdiction. If for any reason the receipt of the taxpayer is not available, the
 board shall deposit the excess moneys with the Controller, as trustee for the owner, subject to the order of the taxpayer, his or her heirs, successors, or assigns.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 860, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Miscellaneous [43441. - 43450.]

43441.

If any taxpayer is delinquent in the payment of any obligations imposed by this part, or in the event a determination has been made against such a taxpayer which remains unpaid, the board may, not later than three years after the payment becomes delinquent, or within 10 years after the last recording of an abstract or copy of judgment under Section 43412 or the last recording or filing of a notice of state tax lien under Section 7171 of the Government Code, give notice thereof, personally or by first-class mail to all persons, including any officer or department of the state or any political subdivision or agency of the state,
 having in their possession or under their control any credits or other personal property belonging to the taxpayer, or owing any debts to the taxpayer. In the case of any state officer, department, or agency, the notice shall be given to such officer, department, or agency prior to the time it presents the claim of the delinquent taxpayer to the Controller.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 756, Sec. 3.   Effective September 25, 1981.)
-------------------------------------------

43442.

After receiving the notice the person so notified shall neither transfer nor make any other disposition of the credits, other personal property, or debts in their possession or under their control at the time they receive the notice until the board consents to a transfer or disposition or until 60 days elapse after the receipt of the notice, whichever period expires first.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 756, Sec. 3.   Effective September 25, 1981.)
-------------------------------------------

43443.

All persons so notified shall immediately, after receipt of the notice, advise the board of all credits, other personal property, or debts in their possession, under their control, or owing by them. If the notice seeks to prevent the transfer or other disposition of a deposit in a bank or other credits or personal property in the possession or under the control of a bank, the notice, to be effective, shall state the amount, interest, and penalty due from the person and shall be delivered or mailed to the branch or office of the bank at which the deposit is carried or at which the credits or personal property is held.
 Notwithstanding any other provision, with respect to a deposit in a bank or other credits or personal property in the possession or under the control of a bank, the notice shall only be effective with respect to an amount not in excess of the amount, interest, and penalty due from the person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 496, Sec. 38.   Effective July 12, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

43444.

If, during the effective period of the notice to withhold, any person so notified makes any transfer or disposition of the property or debts required to be withheld, to the extent of the value of the property or the amount of the debts thus transferred or paid, he or she shall be liable to the state for any indebtedness due under this part from the person with respect to whose obligation the notice was given, if solely by reason of such transfer or disposition, the state is unable to recover the indebtedness of the person with respect to whose obligation the notice was given.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 756, Sec. 3.   Effective September 25, 1981.)
-------------------------------------------

43444.2.

(a) The California Department of Tax and Fee Administration may, by notice of levy, served personally, by first-class mail, or by electronic transmission or other electronic technology, require all persons having in their possession, or under their control, any payments, credits other than payments, or other personal property belonging to a taxpayer or other person liable for any amount under this part to withhold from these credits or other personal property the amount of any tax, interest, or penalties due from the taxpayer or other person, or the amount of any liability incurred by them under this part, and to transmit the amount withheld to the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration at the time it may designate. The notice of levy shall have the same effect as a levy
 pursuant to a writ of execution except for the continuing effect of the levy, as provided in subdivision (b).

(b) The person served shall continue to withhold pursuant to the notice of levy until the amount specified in the notice, including accrued interest, has been paid in full, until the notice is withdrawn, or until one year from the date the notice is received, whichever occurs first.

(c) The amount required to be withheld is the lesser of the following:

(1) The amount due stated on the notice.

(2) The sum of both of the following:

(A) The amount of the payments, credits other than payments, or personal property described above and under the person’s possession or control when the
 notice of levy is served on the person.

(B) The amount of each payment that becomes due following service of the notice of levy on the person and prior to the expiration of the levy.
